Florida, session 2026, SB908.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 19 20 Section 1.âSubsection (2) of section 720.3025, Florida 21 Statutes, as created by SB 906 , 2026 Regular Session, is 22 amended to read: 23 720.3025âAuthority, responsibility, and duties of Division 24 of Florida Condominiums, Timeshares, and Mobile Homes.â 25 (2)(a)âOn the certification form provided by the division, 26 the directors of the association shall certify that each 27 director of the association has completed the written 28 certification and educational certificate requirements in s. 29 720.3033(1). This certification requirement does not apply to 30 the directors of an association governing a timeshare property. 31 (b)âEach homeownersâ association shall create and maintain 32 an online account with the division, as required in subsection 33 (3). 34 (c)âEach homeownersâ association that operates more than 35 two parcels must pay to the division an annual fee in the amount 36 of $4 for each residential parcel operated by the association. 37 If the fee is not paid by March 1, the association will be 38 assessed a penalty of 10 percent of the amount due, and, until 39 the amount due, plus any penalty, is paid, the association is 40 deemed delinquent and does not have standing to maintain or 41 defend any action in the courts of this state. 42 (d)âAll fees the division collects must be deposited in the 43 Division of Florida Condominiums, Timeshares, and Mobile Homes 44 Trust Fund as provided by law. 45 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect on the same date that 46 SB 906 or similar legislation takes effect, if such legislation 47 is adopted in the same legislative session or an extension 48 thereof and becomes a law.